Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2559.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance to Student Lodging, Inc., CERTAIN LAND SITUATE IN MILLERSVILLE BOROUGH, LANCASTER COUNTY.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant and convey to Student Lodging, Inc., a Pennsylvania nonprofit corporation, certain land and buildings situate in Millersville Borough, Lancaster County, formerly known as the Witmer Infirmary, for $1, on terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 0.31 acres and improvements thereon bounded and more particularly described as follows:ALL THAT CERTAIN tract or piece of land being composed of two contiguous lots or pieces of ground, being Lots Nos. 87 and 88 on the Plan of Lots laid out by Jacob K. Shenk, situate in the 20260HB2559PN3769 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142 Borough of Millersville, formerly Manor Township, County of Lancaster and Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, on the East side of George Street also known as North George Street, and having thereon erected a two (2) story brick dwelling house with two story brick attachment, with three (3) apartments and other improvements known as No. 28 North George Street, bounded and described as follows, to wit:CONTAINING in front on the East side of said North George Street, sixty (60) feet, and extending in depth of that width Eastward two hundred forty-five (245) feet, more or less, to a fourteen (14) feet wide alley.BOUNDED on the North by property now or late of A. H. Howard; on the East by said fourteen (14) feet wide alley; on the South by property now or of the Millersville State Normal School, and on the West by said North George Street.Being the same parcel of land conveyed by the General State Authority to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by deed dated June 16, 1989, and recorded at the Office of the Recorder of Deeds of Lancaster County at Book 4186, Page 609 (Parcel 41).Also being the same parcel of land conveyed by Student Services, Inc., to the General State Authority by deed dated November 3, 1966 and recorded at the Office of the Recorder of Deeds of Lancaster County at Book E-56, Page 1032.Known as 28 North George Street, Tax Parcel Number 4405190400000.(c) Lawful and enforceable easements.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not limited to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline 20260HB2559PN3769 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 companies, and under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. If the grantee, its successors or assigns permits any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under subsection (a) to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made by a special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(h) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to the 20260HB2559PN3769 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conveyance under subsection (a) shall be borne by the grantee.(i) Alternative disposition.--If the conveyance under subsection (a) is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(j) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under The Administrative Code of 1929 shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Conveyance in City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the Philadelphia Housing Authority certain land and buildings situate in the City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County, for $50,000.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 1.71 acres and improvements thereon, bounded and more particularly described as follows:ALL THOSE CERTAIN Lots or pieces of ground with the buildings and improvements thereon erected, situate in the Twenty-ninth Ward of the City of Philadelphia, and described as follows:One Thereof, Beginning at the point of intersection of the Southerly side of South College Avenue and the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence extending Eastwardly along the said Southerly side of South College Avenue, Seven hundred seventeen 20260HB2559PN3769 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 feet ten and three-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Westerly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Southwardly along said Westerly side of Twenty-second Street, Two hundred twenty-one feet five inches more or less, to a point on the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence extending along said Northerly side of Poplar Street Westwardly Six hundred eighty-one feet seven inches more or less, to the Southerly side of South College Avenue, and place of beginning.Another Thereof, Beginning at a point of intersection of the Southerly side of South College Avenue and the Easterly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Eastwardly along the Southerly side of said South College Avenue Five hundred sixty-four feet four and five-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Southerly side of Girard Avenue; thence extending Eastwardly along said Southerly side of Girard Avenue, One hundred sixty-nine feet four and seven-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Westerly side of Corinthian Avenue; thence extending Southwardly along said Westerly side of Corinthian Avenue, Four hundred fourteen feet five-eighths of an inch more or less to a point on the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence Westwardly along the Northerly side of Poplar Street, Seven hundred fifteen feet four and seven-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Easterly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Northwardly along said Easterly side of Twenty-second Street, Two hundred forty feet ten and seven-eighths inches, more or less, to South College Avenue and place of beginning.BEING known as 2100 West Girard Avenue.Being inter alia the same premises which The Lankenau Hospital, a Corporation of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by 20260HB2559PN3769 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Deed dated 7/9/1952 and recorded 7/11/1952 in Philadelphia County in Deed Book MLS 152 Page 372 conveyed unto The General State Authority, a Public Corporation and Governmental Instrumentality of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, its Successors and Assigns, in fee.KNOWN AS the former Philadelphia Nursing Home, 2100 W. Girard Avenue, Philadelphia, PA 19130, TAX ID # 881444600CONTAINING 1.71-acres, more or less.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes, and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. OR AS A CLINIC OR ESTABLISHMENT THAT KNOWINGLY PROVIDES SPACE FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL TO INJECT, INGEST, INHALE OR OTHERWISE INTRODUCE INTO THE INDIVIDUAL'S BODY A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN VIOLATION OF THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its 20260HB2559PN3769 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor. OR AS A CLINIC OR ESTABLISHMENT THAT KNOWINGLY PROVIDES SPACE FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL TO INJECT, INGEST, INHALE OR OTHERWISE INTRODUCE INTO THE INDIVIDUAL'S BODY A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE IN VIOLATION OF THE ACT ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT..(e) Use restriction.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition that the Philadelphia Housing Authority, its successors and assigns, shall develop the property solely as a senior living facility and a mixed-income affordable housing project, which may include a mixed-use component to support the underlying affordable housing development, such development to be completed, as evidenced by issuance of a certificate of occupancy for each component of the development, within five years after the date of conveyance. If the development cannot be completed within such period with the exercise of due diligence, the Department of General Services may authorize a longer period for completion, not to exceed 10 years. Should the Philadelphia Housing Authority, or its successors or assigns, develop the property for any other purpose, or not complete the development within the time provided, the property shall, at the Department of General Service's election, revert and revest in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. This provision is intended to create a fee simple subject to a condition subsequent. This condition shall terminate upon the first to occur of the following:20260HB2559PN3769 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) on the date of completion of the development as evidenced by issuance of certificates of occupancy for each component of the project;(2) the reversion of the property to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; or(3) the waiver by the Department of General Services of the reversion.(f) Conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(g) Sublease termination.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be conditioned upon the termination of the existing sublease (LML 1976-1) between the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the City of Philadelphia effective as of the date of the conveyance.(h) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(i) Deed.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made by a special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(j) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(k) Alternative disposition.--If the conveyance authorized under this section is not executed within 24 months after the 20260HB2559PN3769 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(l) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 3. Conveyance to Ferris Land Development.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Department of Corrections and the Governor, may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant and convey to Ferris Land Development a tract of land situate in Benner Township, Centre County, for $90,000, on terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 9.029 acres and is described as follows:All that certain tract of land situated in Benner Township, Centre County, Pennsylvania, being a portion of Tax Parcel Number 12-005-500, as shown on a drawing entitled, "Ferris-Rockview Tract Purchase, Perimeter Survey Exhibit, A Portion of Tax Parcel 12-005-500" dated June 2, 2025, by PennTerra Engineering, Inc., being bounded and described as follows:Beginning at a rebar found, lying in a southerly R/W line of Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp (S.R. 0099, Variable Width R/W) and lying in a westerly R/W line of Shiloh Road (S.R. 3041, Variable Width R/W); thence along said Shiloh Road S42°08'02"E, 58.59 feet to a rebar found, lying in a westerly R/W line of said Shiloh Road and being a northerly corner of lands owned now or formerly by Ferris Land Development, LP (Tax Parcel 37-005-20260HB2559PN3769 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 025, R.B. 2330, Pg. 530); thence along said Ferris lands S51°25'40"W, 1696.88 feet to a rebar found, being a westerly corner of said Ferris lands and lying in an easterly line of lands owned now or formerly by University Area Joint Authority (Tax Parcel 37-005-024G, D.B. 431, Pg. 829); thence along said Authority lands N39°27'36"W, 365.46 feet to a rebar found, being a northerly corner of said Authority lands and lying in a southerly R/W line of said Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp; thence along said Interstate 99 Northbound Exit Ramp the following seven bearings and distances: N62°47'15"E, 111.17 feet to a rebar found; thence N76°28'11"E, 202.24 feet to a rebar found; thence N09°56'40"E, 188.68 feet to a rebar found; thence N67°56'20"E, 100.00 feet to a rebar found; thence N69°08'20"E, 477.54 feet to a rebar found; thence along a curve to the left, having a chord bearing of N65°03'11"E, a chord distance of 296.52 feet, a radius of 2944.79 feet and an arc length of 296.65 feet to a rebar found; thence N62°10'02"E, 433.97 feet to a rebar found, being the place of beginning, containing 9.029 acres.BEING a portion of the same tract of land which W. Fred Reynolds and Louise H Reynolds conveyed to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, by, by deed dated May 7, 1912, and recorded June 21, 1912, in the Recorder's Office of Centre County, Pennsylvania in Record Book Vol. 113, page 19.This 9.029 acre tract is a portion of Tax Parcel No. 12-005-.500-,0000-, but does not adjoin the remainder of Tax Parcel Number 12-005-,500-,0000-. Upon transfer this tract will be known as Tax Parcel Number 37-5-25.(c) Easements, servitudes and rights of others.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject 20260HB2559PN3769 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not limited to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, and under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. If the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under subsection (a) to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services may, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of 20260HB2559PN3769 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(h) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to the conveyance under subsection (a) shall be borne by the grantee.(i) Expiration.--If the conveyance under subsection (a) is not completed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority contained under this section shall expire.(j) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the General Fund.SECTION 2.1. CONVEYANCE TO FERRIS LAND DEVELOPMENT.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND THE GOVERNOR, MAY, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, GRANT AND CONVEY TO FERRIS LAND DEVELOPMENT A TRACT OF LAND SITUATE IN BENNER TOWNSHIP, CENTRE COUNTY, FOR $90,000, ON TERMS AND CONDITIONS TO BE ESTABLISHED IN AN AGREEMENT OF SALE.(B) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) CONSISTS OF APPROXIMATELY 9.029 ACRES AND IS DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN TRACT OF LAND SITUATED IN BENNER TOWNSHIP, CENTRE COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA, BEING A PORTION OF TAX PARCEL NUMBER 12-005-500, AS SHOWN ON A DRAWING ENTITLED, "FERRIS-ROCKVIEW TRACT PURCHASE, PERIMETER SURVEY EXHIBIT, A PORTION OF TAX PARCEL 12-005-500" DATED JUNE 2, 2025, BY PENNTERRA ENGINEERING, INC., BEING BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:BEGINNING AT A REBAR FOUND, LYING IN A SOUTHERLY R/W LINE OF INTERSTATE 99 NORTHBOUND EXIT RAMP (S.R. 0099, VARIABLE WIDTH R/W) AND LYING IN A WESTERLY R/W LINE OF SHILOH ROAD (S.R. 3041, VARIABLE WIDTH R/W); THENCE ALONG SAID SHILOH ROAD S42°08'02"E, 20260HB2559PN3769 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 58.59 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND, LYING IN A WESTERLY R/W LINE OF SAID SHILOH ROAD AND BEING A NORTHERLY CORNER OF LANDS OWNED NOW OR FORMERLY BY FERRIS LAND DEVELOPMENT, LP (TAX PARCEL 37-005-025, R.B. 2330, PG. 530); THENCE ALONG SAID FERRIS LANDS S51°25'40"W, 1696.88 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND, BEING A WESTERLY CORNER OF SAID FERRIS LANDS AND LYING IN AN EASTERLY LINE OF LANDS OWNED NOW OR FORMERLY BY UNIVERSITY AREA JOINT AUTHORITY (TAX PARCEL 37-005-024G, D.B. 431, PG. 829); THENCE ALONG SAID AUTHORITY LANDS N39°27'36"W, 365.46 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND, BEING A NORTHERLY CORNER OF SAID AUTHORITY LANDS AND LYING IN A SOUTHERLY R/W LINE OF SAID INTERSTATE 99 NORTHBOUND EXIT RAMP; THENCE ALONG SAID INTERSTATE 99 NORTHBOUND EXIT RAMP THE FOLLOWING SEVEN BEARINGS AND DISTANCES: N62°47'15"E, 111.17 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE N76°28'11"E, 202.24 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE N09°56'40"E, 188.68 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE N67°56'20"E, 100.00 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE N69°08'20"E, 477.54 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE ALONG A CURVE TO THE LEFT, HAVING A CHORD BEARING OF N65°03'11"E, A CHORD DISTANCE OF 296.52 FEET, A RADIUS OF 2944.79 FEET AND AN ARC LENGTH OF 296.65 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND; THENCE N62°10'02"E, 433.97 FEET TO A REBAR FOUND, BEING THE PLACE OF BEGINNING, CONTAINING 9.029 ACRES.BEING A PORTION OF THE SAME TRACT OF LAND WHICH W. FRED REYNOLDS AND LOUISE H REYNOLDS CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, BY, BY DEED DATED MAY 7, 1912, AND RECORDED JUNE 21, 1912, IN THE RECORDER'S OFFICE OF CENTRE COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA IN RECORD BOOK VOL. 113, PAGE 19.THIS 9.029 ACRE TRACT IS A PORTION OF TAX PARCEL NO. 12-005-.500-,0000-, BUT DOES NOT ADJOIN THE REMAINDER OF TAX PARCEL NUMBER 12-005-,500-,0000-. UPON TRANSFER THIS TRACT WILL BE 20260HB2559PN3769 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 KNOWN AS TAX PARCEL NUMBER 37-5-25.(C) EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS.--THE CONVEYANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, STREETS, ROADWAYS AND RIGHTS OF ANY TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, WATER, ELECTRIC, GAS OR PIPELINE COMPANIES, AND UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ANY LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE ESTATES OR TENANCIES VESTED IN THIRD PERSONS APPEARING OF RECORD, FOR ANY PORTION OF THE LAND OR IMPROVEMENTS ERECTED THEREON.(D) PROHIBITED USE.--ANY CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITION, WHICH SHALL BE CONTAINED IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE, THAT NO PORTION OF THE PROPERTY CONVEYED SHALL BE USED AS A LICENSED FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN 4 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR TYPE OF FACILITY AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW. THE CONDITION SHALL BE A COVENANT RUNNING WITH THE LAND AND SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. IF THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS, PERMIT ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY AUTHORIZED TO BE CONVEYED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) TO BE USED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TITLE SHALL IMMEDIATELY REVERT TO AND REVEST IN THE GRANTOR.(E) COVENANTS, CONDITIONS AND RESTRICTIONS.--THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES MAY INCLUDE IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE ANY COVENANTS, CONDITIONS OR RESTRICTIONS ON THE PROPERTY AS DETERMINED TO BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(F) EASEMENTS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES MAY, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, GRANT ANY EASEMENTS BENEFITING THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, OR RETAIN ANY EASEMENTS FROM THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, AS THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL 20260HB2559PN3769 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SERVICES SHALL DETERMINE TO BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE.(G) DEED.--THE CONVEYANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE MADE BY SPECIAL WARRANTY DEED TO BE EXECUTED BY THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES IN THE NAME OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(H) COSTS AND FEES.--COSTS AND FEES INCIDENTAL TO THE CONVEYANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE BORNE BY THE GRANTEE.(I) EXPIRATION.--IF THE CONVEYANCE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS NOT COMPLETED WITHIN TWO YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE AUTHORITY CONTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE.(J) PROCEEDS.--THE PROCEEDS FROM THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.Section 4 3. Conveyance in Hampden Township, Cumberland County.(a) Authorization for conveyance.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to Friends of Peace Church, a Pennsylvania nonprofit corporation, the following tract of land, together with any improvements thereon, known as the Peace Church, situate in Hampden Township, Cumberland County, for $1, on terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of the following:ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land situate in Hampden Township, County of Cumberland, Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows, to wit:BEGINNING at a nail located at the intersection of the center lines of L.R. 21079, known as St. John's Road, and L.R. 507, 20260HB2559PN3769 - 16 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as Trindle Road; thence south 64 degrees 57 minutes 30 seconds west 88.04 feet to a point; by an arc to the right with a radius of 22,918.31 feet a distance of 84.37 feet along the center line of Trindle Road to a nail; thence north 27 degrees 27 minutes 30 seconds west 116.71 feet to a nail; thence north 26 degrees 39 minutes 00 seconds west 273.15 feet parallel to a stone wall to an iron pin; thence north 69 degrees 23 minutes 30 seconds east a distance of 78.90 feet to a nail in the center line of St. John's Road; thence by an arc along the center lien of St. John's Road with a radius of 1,910.08 feet a distance of 144.44 feet to a nail; thence south 39 degrees 45 minutes 30 seconds east 325.75 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.135-acres of land, more or less.Having erected thereon a two-story stone church building known as Peace Church, or sometimes designated as the German Reformed Church of Peace of Hampden Township, and other improvements.BEING the same property conveyed to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, acting through the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, by deed from The Penn Central Conference of the United Church of Christ, Inc., and St. John's Lutheran Church, Inc., dated August 18, 1969, and recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds of the County of Cumberland at Deed Book K23, Pages 258-264.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies 20260HB2559PN3769 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property, including a right of reversion, as it deems to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(e) Easements.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(f) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee. The conveyance under this section shall be exempt from the realty transfer tax established under Article XI-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(h) Expiration.--If the conveyance authorized herein is not completed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority contained herein shall expire.(I) PROCEEDS.--THE PROCEEDS FROM THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.Section 5 4. Conveyance in Danville Borough, Montour County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of 20260HB2559PN3769 - 18 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the Borough of Danville certain land and buildings situate in Danville Borough, Montour County, for $1, on terms to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) is a portion of the former grounds of the Danville State Hospital consisting of three parcels of land collectively containing approximately 4.48 acres and improvements thereon, together with any right, title and interest of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in an unopened alley, bounded and more particularly described as follows:PARCEL 1ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at a Mag Nail set on the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street) with the intersection of the easterly right-of-way of a 16 foot wide Alley, said Mag Nail is located at the northwest corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence along the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006, (aka East Market Street) and along a curve to the left in a southeasterly direction having a delta angle of 8 degrees 37 minutes 27 seconds, a radius of 2,025.00 feet, with an arc length of 304.81 feet and further described with a chord bearing and distance of South 41 degrees 08 minutes 06 seconds East 304.52 feet to a point of tangency; thence continuing along the southerly right-of-way of said PA State Route 2006 South 45 degrees 26 minutes 44 seconds East 83.27 feet to a point at the northwest corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as 20260HB2559PN3769 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 described in Deed Book 17, Page 463; thence leaving said right-of-way and along the westerly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane and passing through an iron pin found on line at 1.26 feet distant South 32 degrees 27 minutes 17 seconds West 124.60 feet (total length of line) to an iron pin set at the northeasterly terminus of another 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the northerly line of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley, North 44 degrees 26 minutes 25 seconds West 409.00 feet to an iron pin set at the intersection of the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 foot wide Alley with the northerly right-of-way of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the easterly right-of-way of the first mentioned 16 foot wide Alley, North 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds East 137.61 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.13 Acres of land in all.Being a portion of lands as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025, and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.PARCEL 2ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at a point on the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street), said point of beginning being at the northwest corner of lands of the Danville Municipal Authority as described in Deed Book 101, Page 909, said point being 4.92 feet distant on a bearing running North 43 20260HB2559PN3769 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 degrees 34 minutes 09 seconds East from an iron pin found on line, said point of beginning being the northeast corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence along line of lands of the Danville Municipal Authority the following two bearings and distances: 1) South 43 degrees 34 minutes 09 seconds West 262.42 feet to an iron pin DGS Disk found; and 2) thence North 44 degrees 30 minutes 22 seconds West 210.71 feet to an iron pin DGS Disk found at a corner of lands of said Danville Municipal Authority and on the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 68, Page 356; thence along the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane, North 36 degrees 45 minutes 19 seconds East 122.17 feet to an iron pin set at the southeasterly corner of a 16 foot wide Alley; thence along the easterly terminus of said Alley, North 33 degrees 54 minutes 45 seconds East 16.34 feet to an iron pin set at the northeasterly corner of the 16 foot wide Alley and at the southeast corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591, thence along the easterly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591 and passing through an iron pin found at 123.33 feet distant, North 32 degrees 27 minutes 17 seconds East 124.60 feet (total length of line) to a point on the southerly right-of-way of the aforementioned PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street); thence along the southerly right-of-way of said PA State Route 2006 South 45 degrees 26 minutes 44 seconds East 251.88 feet to the point of BEGINNING.Being a portion of lands as described in Deed Book 17, Page 463 and also a portion of lands as described in Deed Book, 5 Page 20260HB2559PN3769 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 426. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025 and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.PARCEL 3ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located in the Borough of Danville, Montour County, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at an iron pin set on the easterly right of way of a 16 foot wide Alley that runs in a northeasterly and southwesterly directions, said pin is located at the intersection with the southwesterly corner of a second 16 foot wide Alley that runs southeasterly and northwesterly directions, said pin is located 153.63 feet distant on a bearing running South 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds West from a Mag Nail set at the intersection of the southerly right-of-way of PA State Route 2006 (aka East Market Street) with the easterly right-of-way of the first aforementioned 16 foot wide Alley which reference is also the northwest corner of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 32, Page 591, said pin also being the northwest corner of the herein described parcel of land; thence from the place of beginning and along the southerly right-of-way line of the second mentioned 16 foot wide Alley South 44 degrees 26 minutes 25 seconds East 411.54 feet to an iron pin set at the southeast terminus of said Alley and on the westerly line of other lands of the Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane as described in Deed Book 17, Page 463; thence along the westerly line of other lands of said Trustees of the State Hospital of the Insane and along the westerly line of lands of the Danville Municipal 20260HB2559PN3769 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Authority as described in deed book 101, page 909 and passing through an iron pin DGS disk found on line at 122.17 feet distant South 36 degrees 45 minutes 19 seconds West 225.00 feet to an iron pin DGS disk found at a corner of lands of said Authority and corner of lands of Roger P. Gratton; thence along the northerly line of lands of said Gratton and along the northerly line of lands of, Joseph L. Estep, et.al, Linda L. Hampton, et.al., Frances Zimmerman, Joseph and Stella Hafer, Penn-East Enterprises, Inc., and Michael G. Collins, et.al, North 39 degrees 39 minutes 36 seconds West 438.69 feet (total length of line) to an iron pin set on the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 foot wide Alley and said set pin is also 14.45 feet distant west of an iron pin found on line at the northwesterly corner of lands of the aforementioned Michael Collins; thence along the easterly right-of-way of the first above mentioned 16 foot wide Alley North 42 degrees 50 minutes 36 seconds East 186.00 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.98 Acres of land in all.Being the same parcel as described in Deed Book 68, Page 356. Being more fully shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025, and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.TOGETHER WITH any right, title or interest of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in that certain 16' wide unopened alley lying between Lot 1 and Lot 3 as shown on a survey plan prepared by Brinkash and Associates, Inc. dated August 9, 2024, Revised August 13, 2025 and identified as Brinkash File Number 3465a-08-25.The three parcels of land described above and the 16' wide unopened alley together constitute Tax Parcel Numbers 12-89-145 20260HB2559PN3769 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and 12-89-146.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Restrictive covenants.--The deed shall contain a clause that the lands conveyed shall be used for municipal purposes, including, without limitation, fire department training, municipal buildings and municipal playgrounds and parks, and if at any time the Borough of Danville or its successor in function 20260HB2559PN3769 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conveys the property or permits the property to be used for any purpose other than municipal purposes, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(h) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by a quit claim deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(i) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(j) Alternative disposition.--In the event that this conveyance is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, as amended, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(k) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 6 5. Conveyance in City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey a certain tract of land together with any improvements thereon, being a 20260HB2559PN3769 - 25 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 portion of the lands of the former Eastern Pennsylvania Psychiatric Institute, situate in the City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County, to Gaudenzia Foundation, Inc., for $1 and under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of the following:ALL THAT CERTAIN lot or piece of ground with the buildings and improvements thereon erected, situate in the City and County of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania as shown on a plan entitled "Relocation of Lot Lines Plan" prepared by Langan Engineering and Environmental Services, Inc., dated 08-14-06, and being more particularly bounded and described as follows, to wit:BEGINNING at a point on the southwesterly right-of-way line of Henry Avenue (variable width), said point being located South 33° 10' 29" East, a distance of 567.15 feet from the intersection of the southwesterly right-of-way line of Henry Avenue and the southeasterly right-of-way line of the Roosevelt Boulevard Extension (a.k.a. U.S. route 1, variable width); thence,1. Extending along said line of Henry Avenue South 33° 10' 29" East, a distance of 224.56 feet; thence,2. On the arc of a circle curving to the right having a radius of 513.79 feet, an arc length of 156.81 feet, having a central angle of 17° 29' 11" and being subtended by a chord bearing South 24° 25' 54" East, a chord distance of 156.20 feet; thence,3. Leaving said line and extending along the lines of Lot 1 South 56° 49' 31" West, a distance of 290.44 feet; thence,4. Still along the same North 33° 10' 29" West, a distance of 20260HB2559PN3769 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 378.94 feet; thence,5. Still along the same North 56° 49' 31" East, a distance of 314.18 feet to the first mentioned point and place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 2.705-acres, more or less.KNOWN as 3200 Henry Avenue, BRT Account # 77-5-0105-10.BEING the same premises which the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, by Deed of Confirmation dated October 2, 2007, and recorded in the Philadelphia County Department of Records Instrument Number 51796039, granted and conveyed unto the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Excepting and reserving those certain easements conveyed by the Grantor to New Courtland Elder Services, Inc., by deed dated January 2, 2015, and recorded at the Philadelphia County Department of Records as Document ID: 52869928.Together with those rights reserved by the Grantor with respect to the above-referenced easements, in the paragraph titled "Reservation" in the deed to New Courtland Elder Services, Inc., dated January 2, 2015, and recorded at the Philadelphia County Department of Records as Document ID: 52869928.(c) Existing encumbrances.--The conveyance under subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Gaming restriction.--Any conveyance authorized under 20260HB2559PN3769 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Use restriction and reversion.--The deed of conveyance shall restrict the use of the property for behavioral health purposes only. If the grantee or successor in function uses the property for other purposes, leases the property for other purposes or attempts to sell the property within 20 years from the date the property is deeded to the grantee, the property shall immediately revert to and revest in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. This restriction shall cease 20 years after the date the property is deeded to the grantee.(f) Deed of conveyance.--The conveyance shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Alternate disposition.--In the event that the conveyance authorized under subsection (a) is not completed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority to convey the property as specified in this section shall expire, and the property may be disposed of in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.20260HB2559PN3769 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the sale under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.SECTION 6. CONVEYANCE TO THE CITY OF HERMITAGE, CERTAIN LANDS SITUATE IN THE CITY OF HERMITAGE, FORMERLY KNOWN AS HICKORY TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA TO GRANT AND CONVEY TO THE CITY OF HERMITAGE, CERTAIN LAND AND BUILDINGS SITUATE IN THE CITY OF HERMITAGE, FORMERLY KNOWN AS HICKORY TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY, FOR THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF $920,000, ON TERMS TO BE ESTABLISHED IN AN AGREEMENT OF SALE.(B) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) CONSISTS OF APPROXIMATELY 7.92 ACRES AND IMPROVEMENTS THEREON, BEING THE FORMER HERMITAGE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD READINESS CENTER, DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN PORTION OR PIECE OF LAND SITUATE IN THE CITY OF HERMITAGE (FORMERLY THE TOWNSHIP OF HICKORY), COUNTY OF MERCER AND COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS, TO WIT:BEGINNING AT A POINT IN THE CENTER LINE OF PENNSYLVANIA HIGHWAY ROUTE NO. 18, WHICH POINT IS AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED TO THE HICKORY TOWNSHIP SCHOOL DISTRICT; THENCE ALONG THE CENTER LINE OF SAID HIGHWAY NORTH FOUR DEGREES FIVE MINUTES EAST (N 4° 5' E), A DISTANCE OF THREE HUNDRED (300) FEET TO A POINT; THENCE SOUTH EIGHTY-SEVEN DEGREES THREE AND ONE-HALF MINUTES EAST (S 87° 3½' E) ALONG LAND NOW OR FORMERLY OF THE ESTATE OF J. R. WISHART, DECEASED, A DISTANCE OF ELEVEN HUNDRED FIFTY (1150) FEET TO A POINT; THENCE SOUTH FOUR DEGREES FIVE MINUTES WEST (S 4° 5' W) ALONG LAND NOW OR FORMERLY OF J. 20260HB2559PN3769 - 29 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 R. WISHART, DECEASED, A DISTANCE OF THREE HUNDRED (300) FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTHERN BOUNDARY OF LAND TO BE CONVEYED TO THE HICKORY TOWNSHIP SCHOOL DISTRICT; THENCE ALONG THE NORTHERN BOUNDARY OF SAID LAND TO BE CONVEYED TO THE HICKORY TOWNSHIP SCHOOL DISTRICT NORTH EIGHTY-SEVEN DEGREES THREE AND ONE-HALF MINUTES WEST (N 87° 3½' W), A DISTANCE OF ELEVEN HUNDRED FIFTY (1150) FEET TO A POINT ON THE CENTER LINE OF THE AFORESAID HIGHWAY AND THE PLACE OF BEGINNING, CONTAINING A VOLUME OF THREE HUNDRED FORTY-FIVE THOUSAND (345,000) SQUARE FEET OF LAND.BEING THE SAME PROPERTY CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA BY DEED OF ARCHIE WISHART AND BLANCHE M. WISHART, EXECUTORS OF THE ESTATE OF J. RUSSELL WISHART, DECEASED, BLANCHE M. WISHART, WIDOW, ARCHIE M. WISHART AND HELEN C. WISHART, HUSBAND AND WIFE, JESSIE W. HUTCHESON AND JOHN A. HUTCHESON, WIFE AND HUSBAND, AND ARCHIE WISHART, ATTORNEY-IN-FACT FOR MARY WISHART THOMPSON AND ERICH THOMPSON, WIFE AND HUSBAND, DATED SEPTEMBER 15, 1955, AND RECORDED ON OCTOBER 10, 1955, IN MERCER COUNTY DEED BOOK "E", VOLUME 21, PAGE 386.CONTAINING 7.92-ACRES, MORE OR LESS.(C) COVENANTS, CONDITIONS, EASEMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS.--(1) THE CONVEYANCE SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ALL LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT CONFINED TO, STREETS, ROADWAYS AND RIGHTS OF ANY TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, WATER, ELECTRIC, GAS OR PIPELINE COMPANIES, AS WELL AS UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ANY LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE ESTATES OR TENANCIES VESTED IN THIRD PERSONS APPEARING OF RECORD, FOR ANY PORTION OF THE LAND OR IMPROVEMENTS ERECTED THEREON.(2) THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES MAY INCLUDE IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE ANY COVENANTS, CONDITIONS OR RESTRICTIONS 20260HB2559PN3769 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ON THE PROPERTY AS DETERMINED TO BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES IS AUTHORIZED, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, TO GRANT ANY EASEMENTS BENEFITING THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, OR TO RETAIN ANY EASEMENTS FROM THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, AS THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL DETERMINE TO BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE.(D) RESTRICTION.--ANY CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITION, WHICH SHALL BE CONTAINED IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE, THAT NO PORTION OF THE PROPERTY CONVEYED SHALL BE USED AS A LICENSED FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN 4 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR TYPE OF FACILITY AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW. THE CONDITION SHALL BE A COVENANT RUNNING WITH THE LAND AND SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. SHOULD THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS, PERMIT ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY AUTHORIZED TO BE CONVEYED IN THIS SECTION TO BE USED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TITLE SHALL IMMEDIATELY REVERT TO AND REVEST IN THE GRANTOR.(E) DEED OF CONVEYANCE.--THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE MADE BY A SPECIAL WARRANTY DEED TO BE EXECUTED BY THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES IN THE NAME OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(F) COSTS AND FEES.--COSTS AND FEES INCIDENTAL TO THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE BORNE BY THE GRANTEE.(G) ALTERNATE DISPOSITION.--IN THE EVENT THAT THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS NOT EXECUTED WITHIN 24 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROPERTY MAY BE 20260HB2559PN3769 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DISPOSED OF BY A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2405-A OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, AS AMENDED, EXCEPT THAT NO PROPERTY DISPOSITION PLAN SHALL BE REQUIRED.(H) PROCEEDS.--THE PROCEEDS FROM THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE ARMORY FUND.SECTION 7. CONVEYANCE IN CITY OF NANTICOKE, LUZERNE COUNTY.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA TO GRANT AND CONVEY TO THE CITY OF NANTICOKE CERTAIN LAND AND BUILDINGS SITUATE IN THE CITY OF NANTICOKE, LUZERNE COUNTY, FOR FAIR MARKET VALUE OF $860,000 ON TERMS TO BE ESTABLISHED IN AN AGREEMENT OF SALE.(B) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) CONSISTS OF APPROXIMATELY 5.483 ACRES AND IMPROVEMENTS THEREON BOUNDED AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THE SURFACE OR RIGHT OF SOIL OF THAT CERTAIN LOT, PIECE, PARCEL OR TRACT OF LAND SITUATE IN THE CITY OF NANTICOKE, LUZERNE COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA, MORE PARTICULARLY BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS, TO-WIT:BEGINNING AT CORNER L ON THE SOUTHERLY SIDE OF THE RIGHT-OF-WAY OF THE PENNSYLVANIA RAILROAD CO., FORMERLY THE NORTH BRANCH RAILROAD CO., SAID CORNER BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF THE WASHINGTON & LEE TRACT #4; THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY NORTH EIGHTYTHREE DEGREES WEST (N 83º 00' W) TWO HUNDRED SIXTY (260) FEET TO CORNER 2; THENCE ALONG THE SAME RIGHT-OF-WAY OF A FIVE DEGREE (5º) CURVE TO THE LEFT HAVING A CHORD COURSE AND DISTANCE OF SOUTH EIGHTY-NINE DEGREES TWENTY MINUTES WEST (S 89º 20' W) 20260HB2559PN3769 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TWO HUNDRED TWELVE AND SEVENTY-ONE HUNDREDTHS (212.71) FEET TO CORNER 3, SAID CORNER BEING ON THE DIVIDING LINE BETWEEN LANDS OF GLEN ALDEN COAL COMPANY AND LANDS NOW OR FORMERLY OF SUSQUEHANNA COLLIERIES CO.; THENCE ALONG SAID DIVIDING LINE, SOUTH SEVENTEEN DEGREES THIRTY-SEVEN MINUTES EAST (S 17º 37' E) FOUR HUNDRED SEVENTY-TWO (472) FEET TO CORNER 4, SAID CORNER BEING ON THE NORTHERLY SIDE OF THE NANTICOKE STREET RAILWAY CO.'S RIGHT-OFWAY; THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY SOUTH SIXTY-TWO DEGREES THIRTY MINUTES EAST (S 62º 30' E) ONE HUNDRED FIFTY (150) FEET TO CORNER 5; THENCE ALONG THE SAME RIGHT-OF-WAY, SOUTH SIXTY-EIGHT DEGREES THIRTY MINUTES EAST (S 68º 30' E) SEVENTY-FIVE (75) FEET TO CORNER 6; THENCE ALONG THE SAME RIGHT-OF-WAY NORTH FORTY THREE DEGREES FIFTEEN MINUTES EAST (N 43º 15' E) FOUR HUNDRED (400) FEET TO CORNER 7; THENCE ALONG THE SAME RIGHT-OFWAY ON A CURVE AND DISTANCE OF NORTH FIFTY-NINE DEGREES TEN MINUTES EAST (N 59º 10' E) TWO HUNDRED AND EIGHTY-TWO (282) FEET TO CORNER 8; THENCE ALONG THE SAME RIGHT- OF-WAY NORTH SEVENTY-FOUR DEGREES FIFTY MINUTES EAST (N 74º 50' E) TWO HUNDRED EIGHT (208) FEET TO CORNER 9; SAID CORNER BEING THE INTERSECTION OF THE RIGHT-OF-WAY OF THE NANTICOKE STREET RAILWAY CO. AND THE RIGHT-OF-WAY OF THE PENNSYLVANIA RAILROAD CO.; THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERLY SIDE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA RAILROAD CO'S RIGHT-OF-WAY ON A FIVE DEGREE (5º) CURVE TO THE RIGHT HAVING A CHORD COURSE AND DISTANCE OF SOUTH EIGHTY-SEVEN DEGREES TEN MINUTES WEST (S 87º 10' W) TWO HUNDRED SIXTY-FOUR AND SIXTY-NINE HUNDREDTHS (264.69) FEET TO CORNER 10; THENCE ALONG THE SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY NORTH EIGHTY-THREE DEGREES WEST (N 83º 00' W) THREE HUNDRED THIRTY (330) FEET TO CORNER 1, THE PLACE OF BEGINNING.CONTAINING SIX AND EIGHT ONE-HUNDREDTHS (6.08) ACRES, MORE OR 20260HB2559PN3769 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LESS.BEING THE SAME PROPERTY THAT THE CITY OF NANTICOKE CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA BY DEED DATED DECEMBER 17, 1934 AND RECORDED AT THE OFFICE OF THE RECORDER OF DEEDS OF LUZERNE COUNTY AT DEED BOOK 742, PAGE 215.LESS AND EXCEPTING .A TRACT OF LAND CONVEYED BY THE STATE ARMORY BOARD TO THE NANTICOKE QUOIT CLUB BY DEED DATED MARCH 17, 1975 AND RECORDED AT THE OFFICE OF THE RECORDER OF DEEDS OF LUZERNE COUNTY AT DEED BOOK 1855, PAGE 374,BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS, TO-WIT:ALL THAT CERTAIN PARCEL OR LOT OF LAND SITUATE IN THE CITY OF NANTICOKE, COUNTY OF LUZERNE, COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:FROM A POINT IN THE NORTHERLY SIDE OF RAILROAD STREET AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE CENTER LINE OF LINCOLN STREET, THENCE GENERALLY SOUTHEASTERLY, A DISTANCE OF TWO HUNDRED NINETYSEVEN FEET (297') ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF RAILROAD STREET TO A POINT WHICH IS THE BEGINNING OF THIS TRACT;THENCE, FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, GENERALLY NORTH ALONG THE DIVIDING LINE OF LANDS NOW OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA AND LANDS OF THE NANTICOKE QUOIT CLUB, NORTH SEVENTEEN DEGREES THIRTY-SEVEN MINUTES WEST (N. 17° 37' W.) A DISTANCE OF ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY-NINE FEET (189') TO A POINT IN THE SOUTHERN LINE OF THE RIGHT-OF-WAY OF THE PENN CENTRAL RAILROAD, THENCE, ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY, NORTH EIGHTY-NINE DEGREES TWENTY MINUTES EAST (N. 89° 20' E.) A DISTANCE OF NINETY-FIVE AND SEVENTY-SEVEN ONE HUNDREDTHS FEET (95.77') TO A POINT, THENCE, ALONG LANDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH, SOUTH FOUR DEGREES, FIFTY-NINE MINUTES EAST (S. 04° 59' E.) A DISTANCE OF TWO HUNDRED AND TEN-HUNDREDTHS FEET (200.10') TO A POINT IN THE 20260HB2559PN3769 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NORTHERLY LINE OF RAILROAD STREET, THENCE, ALONG SAID LINE, NORTH SEVENTY-TWO DEGREES FOUR MINUTES WEST (N.72° 04' W.) A DISTANCE OF FIFTY-EIGHT AND EIGHT-TENTHS FEET (58.8') TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINING 15,100 SQUARE FEET MORE OR LESS.ALSO LESS AND EXCEPTING A TRACT OF LAND CONVEYED BY THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, ACTING THROUGH THE STATE ARMORY BOARD, TO JAMES DONALD LACY AND MARY RUTH LACEY, HIS WIFE, BY DEED DATED FEBRUARY 17, 1977 AND RECORDED AT THE OFFICE OF THE RECORDER OF DEEDS OF LUZERNE COUNTY AT DEED BOOK 1915, PAGE 222, . BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS, TO-WIT: ALL THE SURFACE RIGHT OF SOIL OF AND IN ALL THAT CERTAIN PIECE OR PARCEL OF LAND SITUATE IN THE CITY OF NANTICOKE, COUNTY OF LUZERNE, COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:BEGINNING AT A POINT LOCATED NORTH NINETEEN DEGREES FOUR MINUTES WEST (N. 19 ° 04' W.) SIX AND FIFTY-FOUR ONE HUNDREDTHS FEET (6.54') FROM THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF LANDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA AND THE NORTHERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF NANTICOKE STREET RAILWAY COMPANY; THENCE, ALONG LANDS OF THE GRANTEE HEREIN NORTH NINETEEN DEGREES FOUR MINUTES WEST (N. 19 ° 04' W.) TWO HUNDRED THIRTY-FOUR AND TWENTYSEVEN HUNDREDTHS FEET (234.27') TO A SPIKE IN THE SOUTHERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF RAILROAD STREET; THENCE, BY THE SAME RIGHT-OF-WAY ON A CURVE TO THE RIGHT HAVING A RADIUS OF ONE HUNDRED THIRTY FEET (130') AND A CHORD COURSE AND DISTANCE OF SOUTH THIRTY-THREE DEGREES FORTY-SEVEN MINUTES EAST (S. 33 ° 47' E.) ONE HUNDRED THIRTY-SIX AND FOUR HUNDREDTHS FEET (136.04') TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE SOUTH ZERO DEGREES TWENTY-NINE MINUTES EAST (S. 0° 29' E.) ONE HUNDRED EIGHT AND FORTY-THREE HUNDREDTHS FEET (108.43') TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.20260HB2559PN3769 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTAINING 5,818.77 SQUARE FEET MORE OR LESS.(C) SUBJECT TO CERTAIN MATTERS.--THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ALL LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT CONFINED TO, STREETS, ROADWAYS AND RIGHTS OF ANY TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, WATER, ELECTRIC, GAS OR PIPELINE COMPANIES, AS WELL AS UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ANY LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE ESTATES OR TENANCIES VESTED IN THIRD PERSONS APPEARING OF RECORD, FOR ANY PORTION OF THE LAND OR IMPROVEMENTS ERECTED THEREON.(D) PROHIBITED USE.--ANY CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITION, WHICH SHALL BE CONTAINED IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE, THAT NO PORTION OF THE PROPERTY CONVEYED SHALL BE USED AS A LICENSED FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN 4 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR TYPE OF FACILITY AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW. THE CONDITION SHALL BE A COVENANT RUNNING WITH THE LAND AND SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. SHOULD THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS, PERMIT ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY AUTHORIZED TO BE CONVEYED IN THIS SECTION TO BE USED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TITLE SHALL IMMEDIATELY REVERT TO AND REVEST IN THE GRANTOR.(E) COVENANTS, CONDITIONS AND RESTRICTIONS.--THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES MAY INCLUDE IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE ANY COVENANTS, CONDITIONS OR RESTRICTIONS ON THE PROPERTY AS DETERMINED TO BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(F) EASEMENTS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, TO GRANT ANY EASEMENTS BENEFITING THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, OR TO RETAIN ANY EASEMENTS FROM THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, AS THE 20260HB2559PN3769 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL DETERMINE TO BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE.(G) DEED.--THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE BY A SPECIAL WARRANTY DEED TO BE EXECUTED BY THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES IN THE NAME OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(H) COSTS AND FEES.--COSTS AND FEES INCIDENTAL TO THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE BORNE BY THE GRANTEE.(I) ALTERNATIVE DISPOSITION.--IN THE EVENT THAT THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS NOT EXECUTED WITHIN 24 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROPERTY MAY BE DISPOSED OF BY A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2405-A OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, EXCEPT THAT NO PROPERTY DISPOSITION PLAN SHALL BE REQUIRED.(J) PROCEEDS.--THE PROCEEDS FROM THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE ARMORY GENERAL FUND.SECTION 8. RELEASE OF PROJECT 70 RESTRICTIONS ON CERTAIN LANDS AND IMPOSITION OF PROJECT 70 RESTRICTIONS ON OTHER LANDS IN SANDY CREEK TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--PURSUANT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 20(B) OF THE ACT OF JUNE 22, 1964 (SP.SESS. 1, P.L.131, NO.8), KNOWN AS THE PROJECT 70 LAND ACQUISITION AND BORROWING ACT, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY AUTHORIZES THE RELEASE OF THE RESTRICTIONS IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF THE PROJECT 70 LAND ACQUISITION AND BORROWING ACT FROM THE LAND OWNED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, BEING CONVEYED TO TYLER A. STARCHER AND MAKENNA L. STARCHER, HUSBAND AND WIFE, AND MORE 20260HB2559PN3769 - 37 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C), IN EXCHANGE FOR THE IMPOSITION OF THE RESTRICTIONS IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF THE PROJECT 70 LAND ACQUISITION AND BORROWING ACT RESTRICTION ON LANDS OWNED BY TYLER A. STARCHER AND MAKENNA L. STARCHER, HUSBAND AND WIFE, BEING CONVEYED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D).(B) FREEDOM OF RESTRICTIONS.--THE LANDS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C), OWNED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION AND BEING CONVEYED TO TYLER A. STARCHER AND MAKENNA L. STARCHER, HUSBAND AND WIFE, SHALL BE FREE OF THE RESTRICTIONS ON USE AND ALIENATION IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF THE PROJECT 70 LAND ACQUISITION AND BORROWING ACT UPON THE IMPOSITION OF AND RECORDING OF THE PROJECT 70 DEED RESTRICTIONS STATED IN SUBSECTION (E) ON THE PARCEL OF REPLACEMENT LAND OWNED BY TYLER A. STARCHER AND MAKENNA L. STARCHER, HUSBAND AND WIFE, AND BEING CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, SOLELY FOR THE USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION.(C) LAND TO BE RELEASED FROM RESTRICTIONS.--THE PARCEL OF LAND AUTHORIZED TO BE RELEASED FROM RESTRICTIONS IS LOCATED IN SANDY CREEK TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY. THE FINAL DESCRIPTION WILL BE DETERMINED BY A FINAL APPROVED SUBDIVISION PLAN TO BE PREPARED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION. THE TRIANGULAR TRACT IS GENERALLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND SITUATED IN THE TOWNSHIP OF SANDY CREEK, COUNTY OF MERCER, COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA GENERALLY DESCRIBED, AS FOLLOWS:BEGINNING AT A POINT ON STECK ROAD;THENCE ALONG LANDS OF TYLER A. STARCHER AND MAKENNA L. STARCHER NORTH APPROXIMATELY 136 FEET TO A POINT;THENCE IN A SOUTHEASTERLY DIRECTION APPROXIMATELY 165 FEET TO 20260HB2559PN3769 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A POINT ON STECK ROAD;THENCE FOLLOWING STECK ROAD WEST-NORTHWEST APPROXIMATELY 54 FEETTHE POINT OF BEGINNING.SAID PROPERTY CONTAINS APPROXIMATELY 08 ACRES AND IS SUBJECT TO THE FINAL, APPROVED SUBDIVISION PLAN BY SANDY CREEK TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY, PA.(D) LAND ON WHICH RESTRICTIONS ARE TO BE IMPOSED.--THE REPLACEMENT PARCEL TO BE SUBJECT TO THE RESTRICTIONS IN EXCHANGE FOR THE PARCEL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) IS LOCATED IN THE TOWNSHIP OF SANDY CREEK, MERCER COUNTY. THE FINAL DESCRIPTION WILL BE DETERMINED BY A FINAL APPROVED SUBDIVISION PLAN TO BE PREPARED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION. THE TRACT IS GENERALLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND SITUATE IN THE TOWNSHIP OF SANDY CREEK, COUNTY OF MERCER, COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA GENERALLY BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:BEGINNING AT AN EXISTING MONUMENT, SAID CORNER BEING CORNER NUMBER 194 ON STATE GAME LANDS NUMBER 270; THENCE ALONG EXISTING STATE GAME LANDS NUMBER 270 SOUTH APPROXIMATELY 176 FEET TO THE NORTHERN CORNER OF THE PARCEL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C);THENCE NORTHWEST APPROXIMATELY 68 FEET TO THE LANDS OF HARRY R. HAYS AND THERESA L HAYS;THENCE ALONG THE LANDS OF HARRY R. HAYS AND THERESA L HAYS NORTH-NORTHEAST APPROXIMATELY 126 FEET TO AN EXISTING MONUMENT, SAID CORNER BEING CORNER NUMBER 194 ON STATE GAME LANDS NUMBER 270;THE POINT OF BEGINNING.SAID PROPERTY CONTAINS APPROXIMATELY 08 ACRES AND IS SUBJECT 20260HB2559PN3769 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO THE FINAL, APPROVED SUBDIVISION PLAN BY SANDY CREEK TOWNSHIP, MERCER COUNTY, PA.(E) DEED RESTRICTION.--THE RESTRICTION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE DEED TO THE PARCEL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D) SHALL READ AS FOLLOWS:THIS INDENTURE IS GIVEN TO PROVIDE LAND FOR RECREATION, CONSERVATION AND HISTORICAL PURPOSES AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF JUNE 22, 1964 (SP.SESS. 1, P.L.131, NO.8), KNOWN AS THE PROJECT 70 LAND ACQUISITION AND BORROWING ACT.(F) COSTS.--THE PARTIES TO THIS TRANSACTION SHALL BEAR THEIR RESPECTIVE COSTS.(G) EXECUTION.--THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE SHALL BE EXECUTED AND APPROVED AS PROVIDED BY LAW.SECTION 9. CONVEYANCE IN PENN TOWNSHIP, SNYDER COUNTY.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA TO GRANT AND CONVEY TO PENN TOWNSHIP MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY CERTAIN LAND SITUATE IN PENN TOWNSHIP, SNYDER COUNTY THAT IS TO BE SUBDIVIDED FROM TAX PARCEL 13-07-036 AS REFERENCED IN DEED BOOK 52, PAGE 144 FOR FAIR MARKET VALUE OF $63,000.(B) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (A) CONSISTS OF APPROXIMATELY 5.2988 ACRES AND IMPROVEMENTS THEREON BOUNDED AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN PIECE, PARCEL, AND LOT OF LAND SITUATE IN PENN TOWNSHIP, SNYDER COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA AND SHOWN UPON A SUBDIVISION PLAN AS PROPOSED LOT 1 BY LARSON DESIGN GROUP, FILE 5320-021, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS;COMMENCING AT AN EXISTING IRON PIN ON THE NORTHERLY LINE OF 20260HB2559PN3769 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LANDS OF PENN TOWNSHIP MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY (TAX PARCEL 13-03-251A), SAID IRON PIN ALSO BEING ON A SOUTHERLY LINE OF LANDS OF PENN TOWNSHIP ROAD SUPERVISORS (TAX PARCEL 13-03-026);THENCE ALONG SAID TAX PARCEL 13-03-026, S 88° 21' 35" W, 50.74' TO THE SOUTHEASTERLY CORNER OF T-503 (GAUGLER LANE);THENCE ALONG SAID T-503 BY THE FOLLOWING TWO (2) COURSES AND DISTANCES:1. N 16° 06' 59" W, 40.00' TO A POINT;2. S 73° 53' 01" W, 33.05' TO A SET IRON PIN AT THE SOUTHEASTERLY CORNER OF THE PARCEL HEREIN DESCRIBED, SAID IRON PIN ALSO BEING THE TRUE POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING;THENCE FROM THE POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING AND CONTINUING ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID T-503, S 73° 53' 01' W, 460.00' TO A SET IRON PIN;THENCE THROUGH THE LANDS OF THE GRANTOR BY THE FOLLOWING THREE (3) COURSES AND DISTANCES:1. N 16° 06' 59" W, 501.77' TO A SET IRON PIN;2. N 73° 53' 01" E, 460.00' TO A SET IRON PIN;S 16° 06' 59" E, 501.77' TO THE POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING. CONTAINING 5.2988-ACRES, MORE OR LESS.(C) SUBJECT TO CERTAIN MATTERS.--THE CONVEYANCE SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ALL LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT CONFINED TO, STREETS, ROADWAYS AND RIGHTS OF ANY TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, WATER, ELECTRIC, GAS OR PIPELINE COMPANIES, AS WELL AS UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ANY LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE ESTATES OR TENANCIES VESTED IN THIRD PERSONS APPEARING OF RECORD, FOR ANY PORTION OF THE LAND OR IMPROVEMENTS ERECTED THEREON.(D) PROHIBITED USE.--ANY CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITION, WHICH 20260HB2559PN3769 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL BE CONTAINED IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE, THAT NO PORTION OF THE PROPERTY CONVEYED SHALL BE USED AS A LICENSED FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN 4 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR TYPE OF FACILITY AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW. THE CONDITION SHALL BE A COVENANT RUNNING WITH THE LAND AND SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. SHOULD THE GRANTEE, ITS SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS, PERMIT ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY AUTHORIZED TO BE CONVEYED IN THIS SECTION TO BE USED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TITLE SHALL IMMEDIATELY REVERT TO AND REVEST IN THE GRANTOR.(E) COVENANTS, CONDITIONS AND RESTRICTIONS.--THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES MAY INCLUDE IN THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE ANY COVENANTS, CONDITIONS OR RESTRICTIONS ON THE PROPERTY AS DETERMINED TO BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(F) RESTRICTIVE COVENANTS.--ANY CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE UNDER AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITION THAT PENN TOWNSHIP MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY, ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS, SHALL USE THE PROPERTY SOLELY FOR A MUNICIPAL WELL SITE. SHOULD PENN TOWNSHIP MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY'S, OR ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS, USE THE PROPERTY FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE, THE PROPERTY, SHALL AT THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICE'S ELECTION, REVERT AND REVEST TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(G) EASEMENTS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, TO GRANT ANY EASEMENTS BENEFITTING THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, OR TO RETAIN ANY EASEMENTS FROM THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED, AS THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL DETERMINE TO BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE.(H) DEED.--THE CONVEYANCE SHALL BE MADE BY A SPECIAL WARRANTY DEED TO BE EXECUTED BY THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL 20260HB2559PN3769 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SERVICES IN THE NAME OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(I) COSTS AND FEES.--COSTS AND FEES INCIDENTAL TO THIS CONVEYANCE SHALL BE BORNE BY THE GRANTEE.(J) EXPIRATION.--IN THE EVENT THIS CONVEYANCE IS NOT COMPLETED WITHIN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE AUTHORITY CONTAINED HEREIN SHALL EXPIRE.(K) PROCEEDS.--THE PROCEEDS FROM THE CONVEYANCE AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.SECTION 10. RELEASE OF USE RESTRICTION AND REVERSIONARY INTEREST AFFECTING CERTAIN REAL PROPERTY CONVEYED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA TO RELEASE THE USE RESTRICTION AND ASSOCIATED REVERSIONARY INTEREST AFFECTING CERTAIN REAL PROPERTY CONVEYED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY BY THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, PURSUANT TO THE AUTHORITY CONTAINED IN SECTION 2409-A OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, AS AMENDED.(B) USE RESTRICTION AND REVERSIONARY INTEREST.--THE USE RESTRICTION AND ASSOCIATED REVERSIONARY INTEREST TO BE RELEASED IS SET FORTH IN SECTION 2409-A(C)(5) OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929 AND IS AS FOLLOWS:"THE DEED OF CONVEYANCE SHALL CONTAIN A CLAUSE THAT THE PROPERTY CONVEYED SHALL BE USED FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES BY THE GRANTEE, AND, IF AT ANY TIME THE GRANTEE OR ITS SUCCESSOR IN FUNCTION CONVEYS THE PROPERTY OR PERMITS THE PROPERTY TO BE USED FOR ANY PURPOSE OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION, THE TITLE TO THE PROPERTY 20260HB2559PN3769 - 43 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL IMMEDIATELY REVERT TO AND REVEST IN THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA."(C) RELEASE.--SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A), THE USE RESTRICTION AND ASSOCIATED REVERSIONARY INTEREST PROVISIONS ARE HEREBY RELEASED WITH RESPECT TO ANY DEED CONVEYING REAL PROPERTY TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 2409-A OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, FOR THE FOLLOWING CAMPUSES: DUBOIS, FAYETTE, MONT ALTO, NEW KENSINGTON, SHENANGO, WILKES-BARRE AND YORK CAMPUSES.(D) LEGAL INSTRUMENTS.--ANY LEGAL INSTRUMENTS NECESSARY TO RELEASE THE USE RESTRICTION AND REVERSIONARY INTEREST IN ANY DEED FOR REAL PROPERTY CONVEYED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) PURSUANT TO SECTION 2409-A OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929 SHALL BE EXECUTED BY THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES IN THE NAME OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA.(E) COSTS AND FEES.--ANY COSTS AND FEES INCIDENTAL TO THE RELEASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE BORNE BY THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY.(F) PROCEEDS.--ANY PROCEEDS RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES FOR THE RELEASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.Section 7 10 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Sections 5 4 and 6 5 shall take effect in 60 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2559PN3769 - 44 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627